South Dakota, session 2026, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $101 from the general fund, to the South Dakota Board of
Technical Education, to contract for the construction, completion, and equipping of a trades
center to house technical training laboratories, classrooms, and other student services on the
campus of Lake Area Technical College, including heating, plumbing, water, sewer, electric
facilities, architectural and engineering services, and other services or actions as may be
required.
Section 2. The moneys appropriated by this Act are contingent upon Lake Area Technical
College receiving from gifts, grants, donations, or any other source, an amount of money
equal to the amount required to complete the project described in section 1 of this Act, less
the moneys appropriated pursuant to section 1 of this Act. No bonds may be issued to pay
for the completion of the project.
Section 3. The administration of the design and construction of the project authorized in this
Act is under the general charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration as provided in chapter 5-14.
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.824.20 2 1202
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.